Illinois, session 104th, SB3640.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by adding Section 51.2aaa and by changing Sections 3.24 and 3.1-6 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/1.2aaa new)7    Sec. 1.2aaa. Captive-reared. "Captive-reared" means any 8wildlife that is born, bred, raised, or held in captivity.  9    (520 ILCS 5/3.1-6)10    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-361)11    Sec. 3.1-6. Special deer, turkey, and combination hunting 12licenses.13    (a) For the purpose of this Section:14    "Bona fide current income beneficiary" means an individual 15who, at the time of application for a deer permit is:16        (1) entitled to income, whether income exists or not, 17    from the trust that owns Illinois land on which the 18    applicant wishes to hunt with no condition precedent, such 19    as surviving another person or reaching a certain age, 20    other than the trustee distributing the income; and21        (2) listed by name in the trust documents as an income 22    beneficiary.   SB3640- 2 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    "Bona fide equity member" means an individual who:2        (1)(i) became a member upon the formation of the 3    limited liability company or (ii) has purchased a 4    distributional interest in a limited liability company for 5    a value equal to the percentage of the appraised value of 6    the limited liability company's LLC assets represented by 7    the distributional interest in the limited liability 8    company LLC and subsequently becomes a member of the 9    company under Article 30 of the Limited Liability Company 10    Act; and11        (2) intends to retain the membership for at least 5 12    years.13    "Bona fide equity partner" means an individual who:14        (1)(i) became a partner, either general or limited, 15    upon the formation of a partnership or limited 16    partnership, or (ii) has purchased, acquired, or been 17    gifted a partnership interest accurately representing his 18    or her percentage distributional interest in the profits, 19    losses, and assets of a partnership or limited 20    partnership;21        (2) intends to retain ownership of the partnership 22    interest for at least 5 years; and23        (3) is a resident of this State.24    "Bona fide equity shareholder" means an individual who:25        (1) purchased, for market price, publicly sold stock 26    shares in a corporation, purchased shares of a   SB3640- 3 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    privately-held corporation for a value equal to the 2    percentage of the appraised value of the corporate assets 3    represented by the ownership in the corporation, or is a 4    member of a closely-held family-owned corporation and has 5    purchased or been gifted with shares of stock in the 6    corporation accurately reflecting his or her percentage of 7    ownership; and8        (2) intends to retain the ownership of the shares of 9    stock for at least 5 years.10    "Bona fide landowner" means a person that owns land in fee 11simple and the land is titled in their name.12    "Current owners" means one or more bona fide landowners, 13one or more bona fide current income beneficiaries, one or 14more bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, one or 15more bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 16or one or more bona fide equity partners of a partnership that 17all own the same 240 acres of Illinois land.18    "Immediate family of a bon fide landowner, tenant, or a 19bona fide current income beneficiary" means the spouse, 20children, brothers, sisters, grandchildren, grandparents, and 21parents permanently residing on the same property as the bona 22fide landowner, tenant, or bona fide current income 23beneficiary.24    "Tenant" means a person who rents 40 acres or more of 25Illinois land for commercial agricultural purposes under a 26written notarized agreement with the landowners  SB3640- 4 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    (b) Landowner deer and turkey permits shall be issued 2without charge to an Illinois resident that owns at least 40 3acres of Illinois land and that wishes to hunt on the land that 4Illinois resident owns. Deer permits issued under this 5subsection shall consist of (i) one either-sex deer permit and 6one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer firearm season, 7and (ii) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only 8permit for the archery deer season. Land ownership shall be 9accepted by the Department for:10        (1) bona fide landowners;11        (2) bona fide current income beneficiaries of a trust 12    where the trust owns Illinois land; and13        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 14    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 15    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 16    partnership that owns Illinois land.17    (b-5) Tenant deer and turkey permits shall be issued 18without charge to Illinois resident tenants of at least 40 19acres of commercial agricultural land that wish to hunt only 20on the land of which they are resident tenants. Deer permits 21issued under this subsection shall consist of (i) one 22either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only deer permit for 23the deer firearm season and (ii) one either-sex deer permit 24and one antlerless-only deer permit for the archery deer 25season.26    (b-10) The total number of deer or turkey permits that may   SB3640- 5 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1be issued to a person under this Section shall be established 2by administrative rule.3    (b-15) Bona fide landowners, bona fide equity 4shareholders, bona fide equity members, bona fide current 5income beneficiaries of a trust, or bona fide equity partners 6who do not wish to hunt only on the land that they are 7authorized to hunt on under a permit issued pursuant to 8subsection (b) shall be limited by administrative rule as to 9any other deer or turkey permit that they may be eligible to 10receive. Tenants who do not wish to hunt only on the land that 11they are authorized to hunt on under a permit issued pursuant 12to subsection (b-5) shall be limited by administrative rule as 13to any other deer or turkey permit that they may be eligible to 14receive.15    (b-20) Nonresidents of this State who own at least 40 16acres of land as a bona fide landowner, a bona fide current 17income beneficiary of a trust, a bona fide equity shareholder, 18or a bona fide equity member and wish to hunt on their land 19only shall be charged a fee set by administrative rule. The 20method for obtaining these permits shall be prescribed by 21administrative rule.22    (c) A deer or turkey hunting permit issued under 23subsection (b), (b-20), (g), or (i) shall be valid on all 24Illinois lands where the person to whom it is issued owns the 25land, including land owned by the individual as a bona fide 26landowner, land owned as a bona fide equity shareholder of a   SB3640- 6 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1corporation, land owned by the individual as a bona fide 2equity member of a limited liability company, and land owned 3by the individual as an Illinois resident as a bona fide equity 4partner of a partnership.5    (d) Except for a person hunting under a permit issued 6under subsection (e) or (f), while hunting under a permit 7issued under this Section, a person must carry the permit and 8documentation showing proof that the person is a bona fide 9landowner, a bona fide equity shareholder of a corporation, a 10bona fide equity member of a limited liability company, a bona 11fide current income beneficiary, a bona fide equity partner of 12a general or limited partnership, or a tenant. While hunting 13under a permit issued under subsection (e) or (f), a person 14must carry the permit and documentation showing that the 15person is actively hunting on land covered by the permit.16    (e) The Department may, by administrative rule, issue 17permits under this Section to the immediate family of a bona 18fide landowner, a bona fide current income beneficiary, or a 19tenant.20    (f) For every 240 acres of Illinois land owned by the 21current owners, the Department may issue one guest either-sex 22deer permit and one guest antlerless-only deer permit. The 23guest permits shall be for the same deer hunting season and for 24the same method of take as issued to the current owner. A guest 25permit shall be issued to an individual who is not a current 26owner and is listed on the application for the issuance of   SB3640- 7 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1guest deer hunting permits by a current owner. An individual 2designated by a current owner must meet all the eligibility 3requirements to hunt under this Code and shall pay all fees 4required under Section 2.26 for the permits issued, including 5non-resident fees if that individual is a non-resident. 6Permits issued under this subsection may not be offered for 7resale by the landowner receiving the permit and are 8nontransferable. No more than 5 individuals, regardless of the 9total number of the 240 acres of Illinois land owned by the 10current owners, may be issued guest permits under this 11subsection.12    (g) Landowner deer permits shall be issued without charge 13to an Illinois resident that owns at least 20 acres of Illinois 14land located in a county where the Department has positively 15identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and 16the Illinois resident wishes to hunt only on the land that he 17or she owns. Deer permits issued under this subsection shall 18consist of (i) one either-sex deer permit and one 19antlerless-only deer permit for the deer firearm season and 20(ii) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only deer 21permit for the archery deer season. Land ownership shall only 22be accepted by the Department for:23        (1) bona fide landowners;24        (2) bona fide current income beneficiaries of a trust 25    where the trust owns land in the State; and26        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation,   SB3640- 8 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 2    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 3    partnership which owns land in the State.4    (h) Tenant deer permits shall be issued without charge to 5Illinois resident tenants of at least 20 acres of Illinois 6land located in a county where the Department has positively 7identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd and 8the tenant wishes to hunt only on the land of which he or she 9is a resident tenant. Deer permits issued under this 10subsection shall consist of (i) one either-sex deer permit and 11one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer firearm season 12and (ii) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only 13deer permit for the archery deer season. 14    (b) Landowner deer, turkey, and combination permits shall 15be issued without charge to:16        (1) Illinois landowners residing in this State who own 17    at least 40 acres of Illinois land and wish to hunt upon 18    their land only;19        (2) resident tenants of at least 40 acres of 20    commercial agricultural land where they will hunt; and21        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 22    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 23    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 24    partnership which owns at least 40 acres of land in a 25    county in this State who wish to hunt on the 26    corporation's, company's, or partnership's land only. One   SB3640- 9 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    permit shall be issued without charge to one bona fide 2    equity shareholder, one bona fide equity member, or one 3    bona fide equity partner for each 40 acres of land owned by 4    the corporation, company, or partnership in a county; 5    however, the number of permits issued without charge to 6    bona fide equity shareholders of any corporation or bona 7    fide equity members of a limited liability company in any 8    county shall not exceed 15, and shall not exceed 3 in the 9    case of bona fide equity partners of a partnership. 10    Bona fide landowners or tenants who do not wish to hunt 11only on the land they own, rent, or lease or bona fide equity 12shareholders, bona fide equity members, or bona fide equity 13partners who do not wish to hunt only on the land owned by the 14corporation, limited liability company, or partnership shall 15be charged the same fee as the applicant who is not a 16landowner, tenant, bona fide equity shareholder, bona fide 17equity member, or bona fide equity partner. Nonresidents of 18this State who own at least 40 acres of land and wish to hunt 19on their land only shall be charged a fee set by administrative 20rule. The method for obtaining these permits shall be 21prescribed by administrative rule.22    (i) (b-5) Landowner deer permits shall be issued to 23nonresidents of this State who own at least 20 acres of land 24located in a county where the Department has positively 25identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and 26the nonresident wishes to hunt on their land only. The   SB3640- 10 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1nonresident shall be charged a fee set by administrative rule. 2The method for obtaining these permits shall be prescribed by 3administrative rule. without charge to:4        (1) Illinois landowners residing in this State who own 5    at least 20 acres of Illinois land that is located in a 6    county where the Department has positively identified 7    chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and who 8    wish to hunt upon their land only;9        (2) resident tenants of at least 20 acres of 10    commercial agricultural land that is located in a county 11    where the Department has positively identified chronic 12    wasting disease cases in the deer herd where they will 13    hunt and who wish to hunt upon the land they are tenants of 14    only; and15        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 16    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 17    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 18    partnership which owns at least 20 acres of land in a 19    county in this State where the Department has positively 20    identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd 21    and who wish to hunt on the corporation's, company's, or 22    partnership's land only. One permit shall be issued 23    without charge to one bona fide equity shareholder, one 24    bona fide equity member, or one bona fide equity partner 25    for each 20 acres of land owned by the corporation, 26    company, or partnership in a county; however, the number   SB3640- 11 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    of permits issued without charge to bona fide equity 2    shareholders of any corporation or bona fide equity 3    members of a limited liability company in any county shall 4    not exceed 15, and shall not exceed 3 in the case of bona 5    fide equity partners of a partnership. 6        Bona fide landowners or tenants who do not wish to 7    hunt only on the land they own, rent, or lease or bona fide 8    equity shareholders, bona fide equity members, or bona 9    fide equity partners who do not wish to hunt only on the 10    land owned by the corporation, limited liability company, 11    or partnership shall be charged the same fee as the 12    applicant who is not a landowner, tenant, bona fide equity 13    shareholder, bona fide equity member, or bona fide equity 14    partner.15    Nonresidents of this State who own at least 20 acres of 16land where the Department has positively identified chronic 17wasting disease cases in the deer herd and who wish to hunt on 18their land only shall be charged a fee set by administrative 19rule. The method for obtaining these permits shall be 20prescribed by administrative rule. 21    (c) The deer, turkey, or combination hunting permit issued 22without fee shall be valid on all farm lands which the person 23to whom it is issued owns, leases or rents, except that in the 24case of a permit issued to a bona fide equity shareholder, bona 25fide equity member, or bona fide equity partner, the permit 26shall be valid on all lands owned by the corporation, limited   SB3640- 12 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1liability company, or partnership in the county.2    (j) The Department may adopt rules to administer and 3enforce this Section, including, but not limited to, 4application requirements, proof of ownership requirements, 5proof of residency requirements, eligibility requirements, 6restrictions, and suspension and revocation of permits.7    (k) No person shall be issued more than (i) one either-sex 8deer permit and one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer 9firearm season and (ii) one either-sex deer permit and one 10antlerless-only deer permit for the deer archery season under 11this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 104-59, eff. 1-1-26; revised 9-15-25.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-361)14    Sec. 3.1-6. Landowner or tenant deer and turkey hunting 15permits.16    (a) For the purpose of this Section:17    "Bona fide current income beneficiary" means an individual 18who, at the time of application for a deer permit, is:19        (1) entitled to income, whether income exists or not, 20    from the trust that owns Illinois land on which the 21    applicant wishes to hunt with no condition precedent, such 22    as surviving another person or reaching a certain age, 23    other than the trustee distributing the income; and24        (2) listed by name in the trust documents as an income 25    beneficiary.   SB3640- 13 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    "Bona fide equity member" means an individual who:2        (1)(i) became a member upon the formation of the 3    limited liability company or (ii) has purchased a 4    distributional interest in a limited liability company for 5    a value equal to the percentage of the appraised value of 6    the limited liability company's LLC assets represented by 7    the distributional interest in the limited liability 8    company LLC and subsequently becomes a member of the 9    company under Article 30 of the Limited Liability Company 10    Act; and11        (2) intends to retain the membership for at least 5 12    years.13    "Bona fide equity partner" means an individual who:14        (1)(i) became a partner, either general or limited, 15    upon the formation of a partnership or limited 16    partnership, or (ii) has purchased, acquired, or been 17    gifted a partnership interest accurately representing his 18    or her percentage distributional interest in the profits, 19    losses, and assets of a partnership or limited 20    partnership;21        (2) intends to retain ownership of the partnership 22    interest for at least 5 years; and23        (3) is a resident of this State.24    "Bona fide equity shareholder" means an individual who:25        (1) purchased, for market price, publicly sold stock 26    shares in a corporation, purchased shares of a   SB3640- 14 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    privately-held corporation for a value equal to the 2    percentage of the appraised value of the corporate assets 3    represented by the ownership in the corporation, or is a 4    member of a closely-held family-owned corporation and has 5    purchased or been gifted with shares of stock in the 6    corporation accurately reflecting his or her percentage of 7    ownership; and8        (2) intends to retain the ownership of the shares of 9    stock for at least 5 years.10    "Bona fide landowner" means a person that owns land in fee 11simple and the land is titled in their name. 12    "Current owners" means one or more bona fide landowners, 13one or more bona fide current income beneficiaries, one or 14more bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, one or 15more bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 16or one or more bona fide equity partners of a partnership that 17all own the same 240 acres of Illinois land.18    "Immediate family of a bona fide landowner, a tenant, or a 19bona fide current income beneficiary" means the spouse, 20children, brothers, sisters, grandchildren, grandparents, and 21parents permanently residing on the same property as the bona 22fide landowner, tenant, or bona fide current income 23beneficiary.24    "Tenant" means a person who rents 40 acres or more of 25Illinois land for commercial agricultural purposes under a 26written notarized agreement with the landowner.   SB3640- 15 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    (b) Landowner deer and turkey permits shall be issued 2without charge to an Illinois resident that owns at least 40 3acres of Illinois land and that wishes to hunt only on the land 4that Illinois resident owns. Deer permits issued under this 5subsection Section shall consist of (i) one either-sex deer 6permit and one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer 7firearm season and (ii) one either-sex permit and one 8antlerless-only deer permit for the archery deer season. Land 9ownership shall only be accepted by the Department for:10        (1) bona fide landowners;11        (2) bona fide current income beneficiaries of a trust 12    in which the trust owns Illinois land; and13        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 14    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 15    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 16    partnership which owns Illinois land land in this State. 17    (b-5) (Blank). Landowner deer permits shall be issued 18without charge to:19        (1) Illinois landowners residing in this State who own 20    at least 20 acres of Illinois land that is located in a 21    county where the Department has positively identified 22    chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and who 23    wish to hunt upon their land only;24        (2) resident tenants of at least 20 acres of 25    commercial agricultural land that is located in a county 26    where the Department has positively identified chronic   SB3640- 16 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    wasting disease cases in the deer herd where they will 2    hunt and who wish to hunt upon the land they are tenants of 3    only; and4        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 5    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 6    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 7    partnership which owns at least 20 acres of land in a 8    county in this State where the Department has positively 9    identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd 10    and who wish to hunt on the corporation's, company's, or 11    partnership's land only. One permit shall be issued 12    without charge to one bona fide equity shareholder, one 13    bona fide equity member, or one bona fide equity partner 14    for each 20 acres of land owned by the corporation, 15    company, or partnership in a county; however, the number 16    of permits issued without charge to bona fide equity 17    shareholders of any corporation or bona fide equity 18    members of a limited liability company in any county shall 19    not exceed 15, and shall not exceed 3 in the case of bona 20    fide equity partners of a partnership. 21        Bona fide landowners or tenants who do not wish to 22    hunt only on the land they own, rent, or lease or bona fide 23    equity shareholders, bona fide equity members, or bona 24    fide equity partners who do not wish to hunt only on the 25    land owned by the corporation, limited liability company, 26    or partnership shall be charged the same fee as the   SB3640- 17 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1    applicant who is not a landowner, tenant, bona fide equity 2    shareholder, bona fide equity member, or bona fide equity 3    partner.4    Nonresidents of this State who own at least 20 acres of 5land where the Department has positively identified chronic 6wasting disease cases in the deer herd and who wish to hunt on 7their land only shall be charged a fee set by administrative 8rule. The method for obtaining these permits shall be 9prescribed by administrative rule. 10    (b-10) (b-5) Tenant deer and turkey permits shall be 11issued without charge to Illinois resident tenants of at least 1240 acres of commercial agricultural land who that wish to hunt 13only on the land of which they are resident tenants. Deer 14permits issued under this subsection Section shall consist of 15(i) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only deer 16permit for the deer firearm season and (ii) one either-sex 17deer permit and one antlerless-only deer permit for the 18archery deer season.19    (b-15) (b-10) The total number of deer or turkey permits 20that may be issued to a person under this Section shall be 21established by administrative rule.22    (b-20) Bona fide landowners, bona fide equity 23shareholders, bona fide equity members, bona fide current 24income beneficiaries of a trust, or bona fide equity partners 25who do not wish to hunt only on the land that they are 26authorized to hunt on under a permit issued pursuant to   SB3640- 18 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1subsection (b) shall be limited by administrative rule as to 2any other deer or turkey permit that they may be eligible to 3receive. Tenants who do not wish to hunt only on the land that 4they are authorized to hunt on under a permit issued pursuant 5to subsection (b-5) shall be limited by administrative rule as 6to any other deer or turkey permit that they may be eligible to 7receive. 8    (b-25) (b-15) Bona fide landowners who do not wish to hunt 9only on the land they own, tenants who do not wish to hunt only 10on the land they rent or lease, or bona fide equity 11shareholders, bona fide equity members, bona fide current 12income beneficiaries of a trust, or bona fide equity partners 13who do not wish to hunt only on the land owned by the 14corporation, limited liability company, trust, or partnership 15shall be charged the same fee as the applicant who is not a 16bona fide landowner, Illinois resident tenant, bona fide 17equity shareholder, bona fide equity member, bona fide current 18income beneficiary of a trust, or bona fide equity partner. 19Nonresidents of this State who own at least 40 acres of land as 20a bona fide landowner, a bona fide current income beneficiary 21of a trust, a bona fide equity shareholder, or a bona fide 22equity member and wish to hunt on their land only shall be 23charged a fee set by administrative rule. The method for 24obtaining these permits shall be prescribed by administrative 25rule.26    (c) A deer or turkey hunting permit issued under   SB3640- 19 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1subsection (b), (b-20), (g), or (i) without fee shall be valid 2on all Illinois lands where which the person to whom it is 3issued owns the land, including land owned by the individual 4as a bona fide landowner, land owned as a bona fide equity 5shareholder of a corporation, land owned by the individual as 6a bona fide equity member of a limited liability company, and 7land owned by the individual as an Illinois resident as a bona 8fide equity partner of a partnership.9    (d) Except for a person hunting under a permit issued 10under subsection (e) or (f), while hunting under a permit 11issued under this Section, a person must carry the permit and 12documentation showing proof of that the person is a bona fide 13landowner, a bona fide equity shareholder of a corporation, a 14bona fide equity member of a limited liability company, a bona 15fide current income beneficiary, a bona fide equity partner 16partners of a general or limited partnership, or a tenant. 17While hunting under a permit issued under subsection (e) or 18(f), a person must carry the permit and documentation showing 19that the person is actively hunting on land covered by the 20permit.21    (e) The Department may, by administrative rule, issue 22permits under this Section to the immediate family of a bona 23fide landowner, a bona fide current income beneficiary, or 24tenant.25    (f) For every 240 acres of Illinois land owned by the 26current owners, the Department may issue one guest either-sex   SB3640- 20 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1deer permit and one guest antlerless-only deer permit. The 2guest permits shall be for the same deer hunting season and for 3the same method of take as issued to the current owner. A guest 4permit shall be issued to an individual who is not a current 5owner and is listed on the application for the issuance of 6guest deer hunting permits by a current owner. An individual 7designated by a current owner must meet all the eligibility 8requirements to hunt under this Code and shall pay all fees 9required under Section 2.26 for the permits issued, including 10non-resident fees if that individual is a non-resident. 11Permits issued under this subsection may not be offered for 12resale by the landowner receiving the permit and are 13nontransferable. No more than 5 individuals, regardless of the 14total number of 240 acres of Illinois land owned by the current 15owners, may be issued guest permits under this subsection.16    (g) Landowner deer permits shall be issued without charge 17to an Illinois resident that owns at least 20 acres of Illinois 18land located in a county where the Department has positively 19identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and 20the Illinois resident wishes to hunt only on the land that he 21or she owns. Deer permits issued under this subsection shall 22consist of (i) one either-sex deer permit and one 23antlerless-only deer permit for the deer firearm season and 24(ii) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only deer 25permit for the archery deer season. Land ownership shall only 26be accepted by the Department for:  SB3640- 21 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1        (1) bona fide landowners;2        (2) bona fide current income beneficiaries of a trust 3    where the trust owns Illinois land; and4        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 5    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 6    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 7    partnership which owns land in the State.8    (h) Tenant deer permits shall be issued without charge to 9Illinois resident tenants of at least 20 acres of Illinois 10land located in a county where the Department has positively 11identified chronic wasting disease cases in the deer herd and 12the tenant wishes to hunt only on the land of which he or she 13is a resident tenant. Deer permits issued under this 14subsection shall consist of (i) one either-sex deer permit and 15one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer firearm season 16and (ii) one either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only 17deer permit for the archery deer season.18    (i) Landowner deer permits shall be issued to nonresidents 19of this State who own at least 20 acres of land located in a 20county where the Department has positively identified chronic 21wasting disease cases in the deer herd, and the nonresident 22wishes to hunt on their land only, shall be charged a fee set 23by administrative rule. The method for obtaining these permits 24shall be prescribed by administrative rule. 25    (j) (g) The Department may adopt rules to administer and 26enforce this Section, including, but not limited to,   SB3640- 22 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1application requirements, proof of ownership requirements, 2proof of residency requirements, eligibility requirements, 3restrictions, and suspension and revocation of permits.4    (k) (h) No person shall be issued more than (i) one 5either-sex deer permit and one antlerless-only deer permit for 6the deer firearm season and (ii) one either-sex deer permit 7and one antlerless-only deer permit for the deer archery 8season under this Section. 9(Source: P.A. 104-59, eff. 1-1-26; 104-361, eff. 1-1-27; 10revised 9-15-25.) 11    (520 ILCS 5/3.24)  (from Ch. 61, par. 3.24)12    Sec. 3.24. Before any person, except permittees under 13Section 3.23 of this Act, shall engage in buying, selling or 14processing of captive-reared game birds, captive-reared 15migratory game birds, captive-reared game mammals, or legally 16taken furbearers wild game for the purpose of buying, selling 17or shipping the same, including the carcasses of fur-bearing 18mammals, for public consumption, he shall first procure a 19license to do so from the Department. Dealers in deer, or any 20parts thereof, legally taken and possessed in and transported 21from, other states, shall also be licensed under the 22provisions of this Section. All such deer, or parts thereof, 23shall be marked with permanent irremovable tags, or similar 24devices, to establish and retain their origin and identity.25    The terms "buying or selling" include buying or selling by   SB3640- 23 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1hotel keepers, restaurant keepers and others engaged in buying 2or selling prepared foods for consumption.3    A permit shall be procured for each separate market or 4place of business operated by any person who sells 5captive-reared game birds, captive-reared migratory game 6birds, captive-reared game mammals, or legally taken 7furbearers wild game for public consumption and for each 8vehicle from which captive-reared game birds, captive-reared 9migratory game birds, captive-reared game mammals, or legally 10taken furbearers game or fur-bearing mammals are sold. Such 11permits shall be conspicuously displayed at all times.12    This permit shall be known as a processed wild game 13dealer's permit. It shall be issued by the Department for a fee 14of $25.00 annually and shall expire on March 31st of each year. 15The Department may prescribe the necessary forms as may be 16desirable for the maintenance of records by the licensee, to 17record all transactions in wild game that may be marketed 18under the provisions of the laws of this State and game 19imported legally from other states.20    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to give the 21holder of a processed wild game dealer's permit authority to 22take or sell game birds, migratory game birds, game mammals or 23fur-bearing mammals in their wild state contrary to other 24provisions of this Act. The person in possession of such game 25birds, migratory game birds, game mammals, or fur-bearing and 26mammals has the burden of proving the legality of their his   SB3640- 24 -LRB104 20567 TRT 34047 b1possession.2    No person shall sell the carcasses, or parts thereof, of 3game birds, migratory game birds, or game mammals in their 4wild state for public consumption. 5(Source: P.A. 84-150.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act.